Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.070

Qualification of juror.

A person shall be competent to serve as a juror in the state of Washington unless that person:

(1) Is less than eighteen years of age;

(2) Is not a citizen of the United States;

(3) Is not a resident of the county in which he or she has been summoned to serve;

(4) Is not able to communicate in the English language; or

(5) Has been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her civil rights restored.

[ 1988 c 188 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 203 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 3; 1911 c 57 s 1; RRS s 94. Prior: 1909 c 73 s 1.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: See note following RCW 26.28.010.